Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-20,181.02
Foreign corporation; cessation of domestication.

Any foreign corporation which has so domesticated pursuant to section 21-20,181.01 may cease to be a domesticated corporation by filing with the Secretary of State a certified copy of a resolution adopted by its board of directors renouncing its domestication and withdrawing its acceptance and agreement provided for in section 21-20,181.01.

Laws 1996, LB 1036, § 9.